Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1403
Initiative or referendum; petition; title and text required; filing.

A full and correct copy of the title and text of the law or amendment to the Constitution of Nebraska to be proposed by an initiative petition or the measure sought to be referred to the registered voters by a referendum petition shall be printed upon each sheet of the petition which contains signatures. The petition may be filed with the Secretary of State in numbered sections for convenience in handling.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 385.